California statutes. Education Code
 shall be offered in partnership with a community college district, adult education program, regional occupational program or center, workforce development program accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or an organization that offers industry-recognized certifications. School districts are encouraged to give priority to programs that lead to an industry-recognized certificate or credential.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “supervision” means pupil participation in paid or unpaid on-the-job experiences wherein the supervisor of the training site and certificated school personnel share the responsibility for the supervision of on-the-job experiences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   (AB 542)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Opportunity Schools [46180. - 46180.]

46180.

The minimum day in an opportunity school or opportunity class is 180 minutes. A pupil may be enrolled in an opportunity program for not less than a class period of the school, nor more than 179 minutes per day. Attendance for a pupil enrolled in an opportunity program shall be credited to the regular class attendance.

A pupil who is enrolled in both an opportunity program and a regular school, shall attend school for a period of time not less than the minimum schoolday required for the grade level in which he is enrolled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Adult School [46191. - 46191.]

46191.

(a) In classes for adults maintained for adults in any county jail, or any correctional facility, including any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp, a day of attendance is 180 minutes of attendance; but no pupil in such a class shall be credited with more than one day of attendance in any calendar day, nor with more than 15 clock hours of attendance during any one school week.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a pupil in that class may be credited with more than one day of attendance in any calendar day, and more than 15 clock hours of attendance during any one school week, so long as the total number of units of average daily attendance calculated on that basis for the school district or county superintendent of schools do not exceed the number of units of average daily attendance actually reimbursed for the 1992–93 fiscal year for the school district or county superintendent of schools, as adjusted for any statutorily authorized rates of growth of units of average daily attendance. However, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 46300, no pupil in independent study, in a setting described in subdivision (a), shall be credited with more than one day of attendance in a calendar day.

(c) One adult in a correctional facility may not generate more than one day of attendance if it results in another adult in the same correctional facility being denied classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 670, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Incentives for Longer Instructional Day and Year [46200. - 46208.]

46200.

For a school district that received an apportionment pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, as it read on January 1, 2013, and that offers less than 180 days of instruction or, in multitrack year-round schools, fewer than the number of days required in subdivision (a) of this section, as it read on January 1, 2013, in the 2013–14 fiscal year, or any fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall withhold from the school district’s local control funding formula grant apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the average daily attendance of each affected grade level the sum of 0.0056 multiplied by that apportionment for each day less than what was required in subdivision (a) of this section, as it read on January 1, 2013, up to a maximum of five
 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 29.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

46200.5.

(a) For a county office of education that operates a special day class or special day classes pursuant to Section 56364.2 and that offers fewer than 180 days of instruction, or, in multitrack year-round schools, fewer than the 163 days of instruction,
 the Superintendent shall withhold from the county superintendent of schools’ local control funding formula entitlement computed pursuant to either subdivision (e) of Section 2574 or subdivision (a) of Section 2575, as determined pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 2575, the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The withholding shall be equal the product of 0.0056 multiplied by the amount calculated for the affected pupil’s school district of residence pursuant to subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive, of Section 42238.02 for each unit of average daily attendance of each affected grade level for each day less than what is required to avoid a reduction pursuant to this section, up to a maximum of five days.

(c) This section does not
 apply to special day classes operated in county community schools established pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1 or juvenile court schools established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 40.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

46201.

(a) For each school district that received an apportionment pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, as it read on January 1, 2013, and that reduces the amount of instructional time offered below the minimum amounts specified in subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall withhold from the school district’s local control funding formula grant apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the average daily attendance of each affected grade level, the sum of that apportionment multiplied by the percentage of the minimum offered minutes at that grade level that the school district failed to offer.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year:

(1) Thirty-six thousand minutes in kindergarten.

(2) Fifty thousand four hundred minutes in grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(3) Fifty-four thousand minutes in grades 4 to 8, inclusive.

(4) Sixty-four thousand eight hundred minutes in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 30.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

46201.5.

(a) For a county office of education that operates a special day class or special day classes pursuant to Section 56364.2 and that reduces the amount of instructional time offered below the minimum amounts specified in subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall withhold from the county superintendent of schools’ county local control funding formula entitlement computed pursuant to either subdivision (e) of Section 2574 or subdivision (a) of Section 2575, as determined pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 2575, the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a county office of education shall, at a minimum, offer the
 following amount of instructional time:

(1) Thirty-six thousand minutes in kindergarten.

(2) Fifty thousand four hundred minutes in grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(3) Fifty-four thousand minutes in grades 4 to 8, inclusive.

(4) Sixty-four thousand eight hundred minutes in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(c) The withholding shall be equal to the amount calculated for the affected pupil’s school district of residence pursuant to subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive, of Section 42238.02 for each unit of average daily attendance of each affected grade level multiplied by the percentage of the minimum required
 minutes at that grade level that the county office of education failed to offer.

(d) This section does not apply to special day classes operated in county community schools established pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1 or juvenile court schools established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 41.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

46201.6.

Any school district that elected not to participate in either or both of the longer-day and longer-year incentive funding programs set forth in this article may commence participation in, and begin receiving funding for, either or both of those programs in the 1998–99 or 1999–2000 fiscal years, on the same basis as if it had participated in the program or programs since July 1, 1984, if the district meets the requirement of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 46201 in the fiscal year in which it commences participation and each fiscal year
 thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 10.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

46202.

If a school district that does not participate in the program set forth in Sections 46200 to 46206, inclusive, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, offers less instructional time in a fiscal year than the amount of instructional time fixed for the 1982–83 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall withhold for that fiscal year, from the school district’s local control funding formula grant apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the average daily attendance of each affected grade level, the amount of that apportionment multiplied by the percentage of instructional minutes fixed in the 1982–83 school year, at that grade level, that the school district failed to offer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 31.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

46203.

Amounts apportioned to school districts pursuant to this article shall supplement, and not supplant, apportionments received pursuant to any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 80.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

46205.

(a) For purposes of this article, instructional time for school districts conducting early-late instructional programs in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, shall be computed by adding the total amount of instructional time provided in each portion of the early-late instructional programs to the amount of instructional time offered when all pupils in the class are scheduled to attend. It is not the intent of the Legislature to disrupt or restrict early-late instructional programs for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
 inclusive.

(b) This section shall be applicable only if the early-late instructional program was in operation during the 1983–84 fiscal year, except that the Superintendent of Public Instruction may approve, based on educational reasons, the application of this section to programs commencing operation after the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section is not applicable to any class in any grade level for which class size reduction funding is received pursuant to the Class Size Reduction Program contained in Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28; provided, however, that this section may be applicable to any class in any grade level for which class size reduction funding is received pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 52122 if a school district operated under this section prior to July
 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 621, Sec. 5.   Effective September 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

46206.

(a) The State Board of Education may waive the fiscal penalties set forth in this article for a school district or county office of education that fails to maintain the prescribed minimum length of time for the instructional school year, minimum number of instructional days for the school year, or both.

(b) For fiscal penalties incurred as a result of a shortfall on instructional time in the 2000–01 fiscal year or thereafter, a waiver may only be granted pursuant to subdivision
 (a) upon the condition that the school or schools in which the minutes, days, or both, were lost, maintain minutes and days of instruction equal to those lost and in addition to the amount otherwise prescribed in this article for twice the number of years that it failed to maintain the prescribed minimum length of time for the instructional school year, minimum number of instructional days for the school year following the year, or both, commencing not later than the school year following the year in which the waiver was granted and continuing for each succeeding school year until the condition is satisfied. Compliance with the condition shall be specifically verified in the report of the annual audit of the school district or county office of education for each year in which the additional time is to be maintained. If an audit report for a year in which the additional time is to be maintained does not verify that the time was provided, that finding shall be addressed as set forth in Section 41344.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts and county offices of education make every effort to make up any instructional days and minutes lost during the school year in which the loss occurred, rather than seeking a waiver pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(d) The State Board of Education may grant a waiver pursuant to subdivision (a) without the condition provided in subdivision (b) to any school district that maintained a single session kindergarten class in the 1982–83 school year for more than the maximum number of 240 minutes permitted by state law and that, due to the school district’s growth and facilities limitations, is required to operate two sessions of kindergarten per day in the same classroom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 942, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46207.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 46200 to 46205, inclusive, upon a determination that a school district equals or exceeds its local control funding formula target computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 as determined by the calculation of a zero difference pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03, each school district, as a condition of apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03, shall, for each fiscal year, offer, at a minimum, the following number of minutes of instruction:

(1) To pupils in kindergarten, 36,000 minutes.

(2) To pupils in grades 1 to 3, inclusive, 50,400
 minutes.

(3) To pupils in grades 4 to 8, inclusive, 54,000 minutes.

(4) To pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, 64,800 minutes.

(b) For a school district that has met its local control funding formula target that reduces the amount of instructional time offered below the minimum amounts specified in subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall withhold from the school district’s local control funding formula apportionment for the average daily attendance of each affected grade level, the product of that apportionment multiplied by the percentage of the minimum offered minutes at that grade level that the school district failed to offer.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 school years, a school district that equals or exceeds
 its computed local control funding formula target may reduce the equivalent of up to five days of instruction or the equivalent number of instructional minutes without incurring the penalties set forth in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 71.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

46208.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 46200 to 46205, inclusive, upon a determination that a school district equals or exceeds its local control funding formula target computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 as determined by the calculation of a zero difference pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03, each school district, as a condition of apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03, shall offer 180 days or more of instruction per school year. A school operating as a multitrack year-round school shall be deemed to be in compliance with the 180-day requirement if it certifies to the Superintendent that it is a multitrack year-round school and maintains its school for a minimum of 163 schooldays.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 school years, a school district that equals or exceeds its computed local control funding formula target may reduce the equivalent of up to five days of instruction or the equivalent number of instructional minutes without incurring the penalties set forth in this section.

(c) For a school district that has met its local control funding formula target and that offers fewer than the number of instructional days required pursuant to this section, the Superintendent shall withhold from the school district’s local control funding formula grant apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the average daily attendance of each affected grade level, the sum of 0.0056 multiplied by that apportionment for each day less than what was required pursuant to this section, for up to five
 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 32.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Attendance Recovery Programs [46210. - 46211.]

46210.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to support local educational agencies in conducting evidence-based activities to address chronic absenteeism and loss of attendance due to emergency events. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Establishing a community school model, as described in Section 8901.

(B) Implementing activities or programs to improve attendance and reduce chronic absenteeism, including, but not limited to, early warning systems or early intervention programs.

(C) Implementing restorative practices, restorative justice models, or
 other programs to improve retention rates, reduce suspensions and other school removals, and reduce the referral of pupils to law enforcement agencies.

(D) Implementing activities that advance social-emotional learning, positive behavior interventions and supports, culturally responsive practices, and trauma-informed strategies.

(E) Establishing partnerships with community-based organizations or other relevant entities to support the implementation of evidence-based, nonpunitive approaches to further the goals of the program.

(F) Adding or increasing staff within a local educational agency whose primary purpose is to address ongoing chronic attendance problems, including, but not necessarily limited to, conducting outreach to families and children currently, or at risk of becoming, chronically truant.

(2) The Legislature also finds and declares that opportunities for attendance recovery increase pupil access to instructional time and content that otherwise might not be made available to them, and provide local educational agencies with the ability to recover funding dependent upon pupil attendance. It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies implement evidence-based strategies to address absenteeism and leverage innovation to improve pupil attendance and increase instructional time, especially for more vulnerable and high-needs pupil populations.

(3) The Legislature also finds and declares that access to instruction as part of a regular instructional program is the preferred method of learning for pupils, and the availability of attendance recovery should not discourage local educational agencies that regularly experience school closures from maintaining
 school calendars of greater than 180 days for school districts and 175 days for charters schools to maximize instruction in a regular instructional program.

(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in implementing attendance recovery programs, local educational agencies maintain the same high expectations for pupils participating in regular instructional programs. It is further the intent of the Legislature that a pupil in an attendance recovery program will receive instruction that aligns with grade-level standards that are substantially equivalent to a pupil’s regular classroom-based instructional program.

(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the operation of attendance recovery programs does not negatively impact implementation of expanded learning programs, which are designed to improve pupil engagement and regular schoolday
 attendance, including before- and after-school programs and intersessional programs operated pursuant to Section 46120 and Article 19 (commencing with Section 8420) of, Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of, and Article 22.6 (commencing with Section 8484.7) of, Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that when attendance recovery programs are operated in conjunction with expanded learning programs to achieve fiscal efficiencies, fiscal impacts to expanded learning programs are minimized and pupil access to expanded learning programs are expanded. Local educational agencies are encouraged to offer expanding learning programs to chronically absent pupils as an attendance reengagement strategy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 45.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

46211.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, to address the educational and fiscal impacts of pupil absences, a local educational agency may implement attendance recovery programs for pupils to make up lost instructional time and offset absences, including reducing chronic absenteeism.

(b) (1) An attendance recovery program implemented pursuant to this article may be operated before or after school, on weekends, or during intersessional periods. Local educational agencies that operate attendance recovery programs shall offer access to attendance recovery programs throughout the school year, including, at least once during each term, such as each trimester or quarter. Average daily attendance generated through an attendance recovery program shall be credited
 to the school year in which the attendance recovery program is operated and the local educational agency in which the pupil is enrolled.

(2) Instructional time included for the purposes of generating average daily attendance pursuant to this section shall not be included within the instructional time used to meet the annual day and minute requirements pursuant to Sections 46207, 46208, 47612, and 47612.5 of this code, and Section 11960 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable.

(c) Participation in an attendance recovery program shall not be compulsory or punitive for pupils. Pupils concurrently participating in both an attendance recovery program and an expanded learning opportunities program pursuant to Section 46120 shall retain their ability to participate in the entirety of an expanded learning opportunities program’s offerings pursuant to Section 46120
 for the duration of the school year.

(d) (1) For participation in an attendance recovery program, a pupil shall not be credited with more than the lesser of the equivalent of 10 days of attendance in a school year, or the number of absences the pupil accrued in that school year. For purposes of meeting all of the requirements of this section, an individual pupil shall not be credited with more than one day of attendance for any calendar day of participation in an attendance recovery program.

(2) A pupil shall not be credited with more than five days of attendance per school week for school districts or county offices of education, or more than one day of attendance in a calendar day when school is actually taught pursuant to Section 47612 of this code and Section 11960 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for charter schools.

(3) Attendance accrued through participation in an attendance recovery program shall be tracked and reported to the department by local educational agencies separately from average daily attendance generated during the schoolday in classroom-based programs.

(4) When reporting attendance accrued through participation in an attendance recovery program to the department pursuant to Sections 60900 and 60901, consistent with paragraph (3), the attendance shall be reported separately from those days of attendance not accrued through participation in an attendance recovery program. The department shall also separately report days accrued through attendance recovery programs on its internet website.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 46112, 46113, 46114, 46117, 46141, 46142, 46146,
 46146.5, 46148, 46170, 46180, 48645.3, and 48663, pupils participating in an attendance recovery program operating pursuant to this section may generate average daily attendance. Average daily attendance generated through a pupil’s participation in an attendance recovery program may be accumulated in increments of one hour, as documented by the teacher of each attendance recovery classroom described in subdivision (g) and maintained by the local educational agency. A pupil shall only be credited with not less than a full day of attendance in an attendance recovery program, and only once the amount of time that a pupil participates in an attendance recovery program meets the applicable minimum daily minutes requirements pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 46110) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 46140), including the minimum schoolday for a pupil with an individualized
 education program pursuant to Section 46307, up to the limits established in subdivision (d).

(2) (A) For the purposes of computing average daily attendance for purposes of this article, the minimum daily instructional minute requirements pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 46110) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 46140) apply to all local educational agencies, including charter schools, except for county community schools operated pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1, continuation high schools operated pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 48400) of Part 27, opportunity schools operated pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 48640) of Part 27, juvenile court schools operated pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645)
 of Chapter 4 of Part 27, and community day schools operated pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 48660) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(B) Charter schools shall comply with the minimum daily instructional minute requirements for the applicable grade span pursuant to Sections 46112, 46113, 46114, 46117, 46141, and 46142.

(C) County community schools, continuation high schools, opportunity schools, juvenile court schools, and community day schools shall comply with schoolday and instructional minute requirements for the applicable setting pursuant to Sections 1983, 46170,
 46180, 48645.3,
 and 48663.

(f) As a condition of generating average daily attendance, an attendance recovery program shall be composed of pupils engaged in educational activities and content aligned to grade level standards that are substantially equivalent to the pupils’ regular instructional program, which may include one-on-one or small group tutoring, and shall be under the immediate supervision and control of a certificated teacher who is also an employee of the local educational agency and who possesses a valid certification document, registered as required by law, pursuant to Sections 46300 and 47612.5. An attendance recovery program shall not exceed a pupil-to-certificated teacher ratio of 10 to 1 for transitional kindergarten and kindergarten or 20 to 1 for grades 1 to 12, inclusive. A local educational agency shall maintain documentation demonstrating how the attendance recovery program met the applicable ratios required pursuant to
 this subdivision.

(g) (1) An attendance recovery program shall be provided only as a limited-term option for a classroom-based, regular educational program for pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. Pupils otherwise enrolled in a nonclassroom-based program, including pupils served by a nonclassroom-based charter school pursuant to Section 47612.5, shall not participate in an attendance recovery program and a local educational agency shall not generate apportionment through an attendance recovery program for pupils enrolled in a nonclassroom-based program.

(2) (A) For school districts, a pupil is enrolled in a nonclassroom-based program for purposes of this subdivision if the pupil meets the minimum day requirements for independent study and is continually enrolled in independent study for more
 than 15 schooldays in a school year.

(B) For charter schools, a pupil is enrolled in a nonclassroom-based program for purposes of this subdivision if the pupil is continually enrolled in independent study for more than 15 schooldays on any of the days on which school is taught for the purpose of meeting the requirement to offer 175 instructional days, as described in Section 11960 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) A charter school that serves pupils pursuant to Section 47612.1 shall not participate in an attendance recovery program operated pursuant to this section.

(h) On or before June 30, 2025, the department shall develop and maintain on its internet website guidance to support local educational agencies in creating and implementing high-quality attendance recovery programs.

(i) (1) In consultation with the executive director of the state board, the department shall research local pupil information systems to identify opportunities for local educational agencies to collect and report to the state more nuanced data about the reasons for pupil absences.

(2) At a minimum, the department shall investigate opportunities to use and improve existing pupil information systems to more accurately track pupil absences and their reasons, including, but not limited to, those absences caused by each of the following:

(A) School closures due to emergencies pursuant to Section 41422.

(B) Schooldays of materially decreased attendance due to emergencies pursuant to Section 46392.

(C) Pupil absences due to emergencies pursuant to Section 46392, or any other personal or large-scale emergencies.

(3) The department shall use the research collected pursuant to this subdivision to develop recommendations to amend existing laws, regulations, guidance, and processes to collect, aggregate, and disaggregate absenteeism data from local educational agencies to provide additional clarity on the causes of pupil absenteeism across the state, including by pupil subgroup. These recommendations shall include steps to calculate an adjusted chronic absenteeism rate that does not include absences due to emergencies pursuant to Section 46392.

(4) On or before January 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the chairs of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature,
 the Superintendent, the executive director of the state board, and the Director of Finance.

(j) Commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate verification of compliance with the requirements specified in subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, including loss of apportionment for an attendance recovery program pursuant to this article for local educational agencies found to be noncompliant.

(k) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(2) “School year” has the same meaning as described in Section
 37200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 744, Sec. 7.   (SB 147)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Average Daily Attendance [46300. - 46393.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [46300. - 46307.1.]

46300.

(a) In computing average daily attendance of a school district or county office of education, there shall be included the attendance of pupils while engaged in educational activities required of those pupils and under the immediate supervision and control of an employee of the district or county office who possessed a valid certification document, registered as required by law.

(b) (1) For purposes of a work experience education program in a secondary school that meets the standards of the California State Plan for Career Technical Education, “immediate supervision,” in the context of off-campus work training stations, means pupil participation in on-the-job training as outlined under a training agreement, coordinated by the school district
 under a state-approved plan, wherein the employer and certificated school personnel share the responsibility for on-the-job supervision.

(2) The pupil-teacher ratio in a work experience program shall not exceed 125 pupils per full-time equivalent certificated teacher coordinator. This ratio may be waived by the state board pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 33050) of Chapter 1 of Part 20 of Division 2 under criteria developed by the state board.

(3) A pupil enrolled in a work experience program shall not be credited with more than one day of attendance per calendar day, and shall be a full-time pupil enrolled in regular classes that meet the requirements of Section 46141 or 46144.

(c) (1) For purposes of the rehabilitative schools, classes, or programs described in Section 48917 that
 require immediate supervision, “immediate supervision” means that the person to whom the pupil is required to report for training, counseling, tutoring, or other prescribed activity shares the responsibility for the supervision of the pupils in the rehabilitative activities with certificated personnel of the district.

(2) A pupil enrolled in a rehabilitative school, class, or program shall not be credited with more than one day of attendance per calendar day.

(d) (1) For purposes of computing the average daily attendance of pupils engaged in the educational activities required of high school pupils who are also enrolled in a regional occupational center or regional occupational program, the school district shall receive proportional average daily attendance credit for those educational activities that are less than the minimum schoolday, pursuant to
 regulations adopted by the state board; however, none of that attendance shall be counted for purposes of computing attendance pursuant to Section 52324.

(2) A school district shall not receive proportional average daily attendance credit pursuant to this subdivision for a pupil in attendance for less than 145 minutes each day.

(3) The divisor for computing proportional average daily attendance pursuant to this subdivision is 240, except that, in the case of a pupil excused from physical education classes pursuant to Section 52316, the divisor is 180.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, travel time of pupils to attend a regional occupational center or regional occupational program shall not be used in any manner in the computation of average daily attendance.

(e) (1) In computing the average daily attendance of a school district, there shall also be included the attendance of pupils participating in independent study conducted pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28.

(2) A pupil participating in independent study shall not be credited with more than one day of attendance per calendar day.

(f) For purposes of cooperative career technical education programs and community classrooms described in Section 52372.1, “immediate supervision” means pupil participation in paid and unpaid on-the-job experiences, as outlined under a training agreement and individualized training plans wherein the supervisor of the training site and certificated school personnel share the responsibility for the supervision of on-the-job experiences.

(g) (1) In computing the average daily attendance of a school district or charter school, there shall be included the attendance of pupils in kindergarten after they have completed one school year in kindergarten or pupils in a transitional kindergarten program after they have completed one year in that program if one of the following conditions is met:

(A) The school district or charter school has on file for each of those pupils an agreement made pursuant to Section 48011, approved in form and content by the department and signed by the pupil’s parent or guardian, that the pupil may continue in kindergarten for not more than one additional school year.

(B) The pupils participated in a transitional kindergarten program pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 48000.

(2) A school district or charter school may not include for apportionment purposes the attendance of any pupil for more than two years in kindergarten or for more than two years in a combination of transitional kindergarten and kindergarten.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 46.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

46300.1.

Commencing July 1, 1993, no school district may receive school district apportionments pursuant to Section 42238 for independent study by pupils 21 years of age or older or by pupils 19 years of age or older who have not been continuously enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, since their 18th birthday.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1195, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

46300.2.

The State Department of Education shall apportion funds for community school and independent study average daily attendance only for average daily attendance claimed by school districts and county superintendents of schools for pupils who officially reside in the county in which the apportionment claim is reported, or who officially reside in a county immediately adjacent to the county in which the apportionment claim is reported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 27.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46300.3.

An employee of the Mountain Valley Special Education Joint Powers Authority who possessed a valid certification document, registered as required by law, shall be deemed an employee of a school district in the County of Shasta or an employee of the Shasta County Office of Education who possessed a valid certification document, registered as required by law, for purposes of Section 46300.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 623, Sec. 1.   (SB 648)   Effective October 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

46300.5.
